Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Eradication of Johnson Grass

43-6-201. Adoption of part by county legislative body.

The various county legislative bodies of the state may by resolution adopt this part by a vote of its members. Upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body for the adoption of this part, the results of the vote shall be certified to the commissioner of agriculture. If a majority of the votes cast are against the adoption of this part, the question shall not be resubmitted for reconsideration of the county legislative body for at least one (1) year after the vote.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 43-2701.

Cross-References. Pest control board, § 62-21-104.

Pest control operators, title 62, ch. 21.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

43-6-202. Johnson grass extermination areas — Designation by commissioner of agriculture — Notice.

The commissioner of agriculture shall within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice from the county clerk as provided in § 43-6-201 declare the county to be a “Johnson grass extermination area” and the commissioner shall cause suitable notice to be published in a newspaper in the county for two (2) consecutive weeks. The notice shall specify that the county has been declared a Johnson grass extermination area and that all property owners in the county shall, not later than April 30 following the publication of the notice, take steps to control and eradicate Johnson grass on all lands owned by them or under their control. The commissioner may have inserted in the notice such other pertinent and relevant information as the commissioner may deem advisable.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 43-2702.

43-6-203. County weed control boards.

The commissioner of agriculture shall, within ten (10) days after receipt of the notice provided for in § 43-6-201, appoint a three-member county weed control board composed of citizens of the county, which shall be named by the county legislative body to serve as advisors and to assist the commissioner in the administration of this chapter and to perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

Members of the board shall receive no salary for their services, but shall be reimbursed by the county legislative body for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 43-2703.

43-6-204. Duties of commissioner of agriculture.

The commissioner of agriculture has the duty under this part to:

Assist the county weed control board, all public utilities, the department of transportation, the county legislative body, drainage districts, the county highway department, other public and quasi-public corporations and other interested parties in the control and eradication of Johnson grass;

Be informed of the origin, nature and appearance of Johnson grass and the manner in which it is disseminated and shall follow recommendations of the University of Tennessee, college of agricultural sciences and natural resources, as to the best and approved method to control, eradicate and prevent the dissemination of Johnson grass; and

Cooperate with and have authority to enter into cooperative agreements with state and federal agencies and departments for the furtherance of the control and eradication of Johnson grass.

The commissioner shall make all rules and regulations for carrying out this part and its requirements.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 43-2704.

43-6-205. Inspection of land by county weed control boards.

The county weed control board is responsible for the inspection of lands and places for compliance with this part, and has the authority to employ all necessary assistance required for inspections, and shall certify the expense thereof to the county clerk for payment.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designated representative, as well as the county weed control board or the designated representative of the board, shall have the right of ingress or egress upon all lands in the county in making an inspection or performing any other duties imposed by this part.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 43-2705.

43-6-206. Failure to comply — Prosecution.

Upon failure or refusal to comply with this part, the failure or refusal shall be reported by the county weed control board to the district attorney general for the county affected, and it shall be the duty of the district attorney general to prosecute all persons violating this part in the manner provided in this part.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 6; T.C.A., § 43-2706.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

43-6-207. Duty to control and exterminate.

It is the duty of all public utilities where they control the surface area, the department of transportation, the county legislative body, drainage districts, county road departments and other public and quasi-public corporations and every landowner in Johnson grass extermination areas, to:

Control and eradicate Johnson grass and prevent its regrowth and reinfestation on all lands, rights-of-way and easements owned, occupied or controlled by them;

Employ methods of control and eradication and for the prevention of the regrowth and reinfestation of Johnson grass as directed by the commissioner of agriculture or the county weed control board; and

Comply with all orders, rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of agriculture pursuant to this part.

The department of transportation may not enter into such program on a pilot basis with more than one (1) county.

The state shall not be held civilly liable for any act in compliance with the purpose and intent of this part.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 43-2707.

43-6-208. Nuisance — Action to enjoin.

The existence or growth of Johnson grass, in counties electing to come under this part, is declared to be a public and common nuisance and the district attorneys general for and in those counties affected shall have the duty to bring an action in the circuit court of such county to enjoin this nuisance. The action shall be brought in the name of the state of Tennessee and shall be tried as in equity cases. In order to sustain the action, it shall be necessary to allege that thirty (30) days' advance notice of the filing of the suit has been served upon the defendant or defendants, and that the defendant or defendants, have taken no suitable action to comply with this part prior to the filing of the suit. Any landowner whose land is adjacent to or within one hundred feet (100') of land on which the nuisance is permitted or maintained and who is not undertaking a Johnson grass control program may bring a civil action for injunction against any person permitting or maintaining the nuisance and shall, in addition to injunctive relief, be entitled to recover as a penalty the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) and any actual damages sustained as a result of the maintenance of the nuisance.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 8; T.C.A., § 43-2708.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

43-6-209. Appropriation of funds by county.

Upon the adoption of this part by a county, such county thereafter is specifically authorized to appropriate funds to carry out and administer this part.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 10; T.C.A., § 43-2709.

43-6-210. Removal of county from provisions of part.

When any particular county has adopted this part and brings itself within this part, it may at any subsequent time remove itself from the provisions hereof by a proper resolution therefor adopted by a majority vote of the county legislative body. Upon the adoption of such resolution, this part shall not apply to the county.

Acts 1961, ch. 306, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 43-2710.